Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-701
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 30-701 to 30-713:

(1) Adult child means an individual who is at least nineteen years of age and who is related to a resident biologically, through adoption, through the marriage or former marriage of the resident to the biological parent of the adult child, or by a judgment of parentage entered by a court of competent jurisdiction;

(2) Caregiver means a guardian, a designee under a power of attorney for health care, or another person or entity denying visitation access between a family member petitioner and a resident;

(3) Family member petitioner means the spouse, adult child, adult grandchild, parent, grandparent, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, cousin, or domestic partner of a resident;

(4) Guardian ad litem has the definition found in section 30-2601;

(5) Isolation has the definition found in section 28-358.01;

(6) Resident means an adult resident of:

(a) A health care facility as defined in section 71-413; or

(b) Any home or other residential dwelling in which the resident is receiving care and services from any person;

(7) Visitation means an in-person meeting or any telephonic, written, or electronic communication; and

(8) Visitor means a person appointed pursuant to section 30-2619.01.

Laws 2017, LB122, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2017, § 42-1301;

Laws 2018, LB845, § 1.